District of Columbia statutes.
10-1103.07a

Waiver and compromise; authority of the Chief Financial Officer.

The Chief Financial Officer may:

(1)

Waive, in whole or in part, interest assessed pursuant to this subchapter in the interest of equity or in the public interest; or

(2)

Compromise any charge or vault rent assessed pursuant to this subchapter when, in the Chief Financial Officer’s judgment, there is reasonable doubt as to the liability of the owner against whom the vault rent was assessed or the collectability of the tax.

History

Oct. 17, 1968, 82 Stat. 1159, Pub. L. 90-596, title III, § 308a
as added Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 6002(g), 61 DCR 9990

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of Pub. L. 90-596, § 308a, see § 6002(g) and 6003(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of Pub. L. 90-596, § 308a, see § 6002(g) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of Pub. L. 90-596, § 308a, see § 6002(g) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).